Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Records of Secondhand Article Transactions.

Sec. 08.76.010.
Transactions to be entered in book kept at place of business; electronic records.

A person engaged in the business of buying and selling secondhand articles, except a bank or a person regulated by AS

08.76.100

—

08.76.590

, shall maintain a book, in permanent form, in which the person shall enter in legible English at the time of each purchase or sale

the date of the transaction;

the name of the person conducting the transaction;

the name, age, and address of the customer;

a description of the property bought, which includes, for any firearm, watch, camera, or optical equipment bought, the name of the maker, the serial, model, or other number, and all letters and marks inscribed;

the price paid;

the signature of the customer.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 49 SLA 2010.]

History.

(§ 35-2-201 ACLA 1949; am § 10 ch 75 SLA 2008; am §§ 3, 7 ch 49 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008, explicitly declares § 10, ch. 75, SLA 2008, adding (b) of this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 08.76.020.
Manner of recording entry.

The entries in the book required by AS

08.76.010

shall appear in chronological order in ink or indelible pencil. Blank lines may not be left between entries. Obliterations, alterations, or erasures may not be made. Corrections shall be made by drawing a line through the entry without destroying its legibility, and the line shall be drawn in ink. The book shall be open to the inspection of a peace officer at reasonable times.

History.

(§ 35-2-201 ACLA 1949; am § 11 ch 75 SLA 2008; am § 4 ch 49 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008, explicitly declares § 11, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 08.76.030.
Criminal liability.

A person who violates AS

08.76.010

or

08.76.020

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 35-2-202 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 08.76.040.
Disposition of unredeemed property. [Repealed, § 7 ch 49 SLA 2010.]